California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) Not less than 11 percent of the funds authorized in paragraph (1) of subdivision (l) of Section 5096.310 shall be available as grants administered by the department to cities, counties, and nonprofit organizations for the development, rehabilitation, or restoration of facilities accredited by the American Zoo and Aquarium Association (AZA) and operated by cities, counties, and nonprofit organizations, and to cities, counties, and nonprofit organizations for the development, rehabilitation, or restoration of zoos and aquariums operated by cities, counties, and nonprofit organizations, but not yet accredited by the AZA. This program shall be known, and may be cited, as the Dr. Paul Chaffee Zoological Program. Allocation in awarding grants pursuant to this section shall be in
 accordance with the following schedule:

(1) Individual grants of up to one million dollars ($1,000,000), or an amount to be determined by dividing 95 percent of the total zoo and aquarium funds available pursuant to this subdivision by the number of AZA accredited institutions at the time of enactment of this section, shall be made available to zoos and aquariums that are AZA accredited.

(2) Not less than 20 percent or two million dollars ($2,000,000), whichever is greater, of the funds available pursuant to this subdivision shall be reserved for institutions with annual operating budgets of less than one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(3) Not more than 5 percent of the total funds available pursuant to this subdivision, shall be made available as grants to zoos and aquariums that have initiated the AZA accreditation
 process but are not yet accredited at the time of the enactment of this section. Grants awarded under this subdivision shall be dedicated to projects that will enhance the institution’s ability to meet standards of AZA accreditation.

(4) Not more than 5 percent of the total funds available pursuant to this subdivision shall be granted for publicly owned or nonprofit zoos and wildlife centers that may not be accredited, but that care for animals that have been injured or abandoned and that cannot be returned to the wild. To be eligible for this portion of those funds, applicants shall demonstrate that they serve a regional area, foster the environmental relationships of animals within that region, and operate outreach and onsite programs communicating those objectives to the public.

(b) At least ten million dollars ($10,000,000) of the funds allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (l) of Section 5096.310 shall be provided to the California Science Center for implementation of the Exposition Master Plan. Three million dollars ($3,000,000) of this amount shall be made available to the California African American Museum for completion of its education and visitor facility in Exposition Park and seven million dollars ($7,000,000) of this amount shall be made available for the California Science Center School.

(c) Not less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) of the funds allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (l) of Section 5096.310 shall be available as grants for facilities for education programs focused on the National Marine Sanctuaries along California’s coast.

(d) Not less than forty-four million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($44,750,000) of the funds allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision
 (l) of Section 5096.310 shall be made available for the following purposes:

(1) At least ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be provided to the Discovery Science Center in Santa Ana for capital improvement.

(2) At least ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be provided to the California Academy of the Sciences for capital improvement projects.

(3) At least two million dollars ($2,000,000) shall be provided toward the creation of the Delta Science Center to carry out significant marine and delta aquatic education and interpretive programs.

(4) At least fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) shall be provided to the Alliance of Redding Museums for capital improvements for the Turtle Bay-Museums and the Arboretum on the River.

(5) An individual grant of four million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($4,250,000) shall be made to the Department of Food and Agriculture for capital outlay to assist with an approved contract entered into on or before January 1, 2000, for an exposition or state fair relocation in any county with a population greater than 5,000,000.

(6) The sum of three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000) to enhance the two-acre historical exhibit at the Kern County Museum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 559, Sec. 79.   (AB 2143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.340.

(a) Not less than 11 percent of the funds authorized in paragraph (1) of subdivision (l) of Section 5096.310 shall be available as grants on a competitive basis to cities, counties, and nonprofit organizations for the development or rehabilitation of real property consisting of urban recreational and cultural centers, museums, and facilities for wildlife education or environmental
 education.

(b) To be eligible for funding, a project shall initially be nominated by a Member of the Legislature for study by the department.

(c) In establishing priorities of projects, the department shall consider any favorable project characteristics, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The project will interpret one or more important California historical, cultural, economic, or resource themes or an important historical, cultural, economic, technological, or resource theme in a major region of California. Higher priority shall be assigned to projects whose themes are not interpreted in any existing museum or have demonstrable deficiencies in their presentation in an existing museum.

(2) The project is proposed to be operated on
 lands that are already in public ownership or on lands that will be acquired and used for the project in conjunction with adjoining public lands.

(3) Projects that are closely related geographically to the resources, activity, structure, place, or collection of objects to be interpreted, and are close to population centers and access routes.

(4) Projects that are in, or close to, population centers or are adjacent to, or readily served by, a state highway or other mode of public transportation.

(5) Projects for which there are commitments, or the serious likelihood of commitments, of funds or the donation of land or other property suitable for the project.

(d) The department shall annually forward a list of the highest priority projects to the
 Department of Finance for inclusion in the Budget Bill.

(e) An application for a grant for a cooperative museum project shall be submitted jointly by the city, county, or other public agency, an institute of higher learning, or a nonprofit organization that cooperatively is operating, or will operate, the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 144.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.341.

(a) The director shall prepare and adopt criteria and procedures for evaluating applications for grants allocated pursuant to subdivisions (f), (g), (h), (i), and (l) of Section 5096.310. Individual applications for funds shall be submitted to the department for approval as to their conformity with the requirements of this chapter. The application shall be accompanied by certification from the planning agency of the applicant that the project for which the grant is
 requested is consistent with the park and recreation element of the applicable city or county general plan or the district park and recreation plan, as the case may be, and will satisfy a high priority need. To utilize available grant funds as effectively as possible, overlapping or adjoining jurisdictions are encouraged to combine projects and submit a joint application.

(b) Any applicant may allocate all or a portion of its per capita share for a regional or state project.

(c) The director shall annually forward a statement of the total amount to be appropriated in each fiscal year for projects approved for grants pursuant to subdivisions (f), (g), (h), (i), and (l) of Section 5096.310 to the Director of Finance for inclusion in the Budget Bill. A list of eligible jurisdictions and the amount of grant funds to be allocated to each shall also be made available by the
 department.

(d) (1) Funds appropriated for grants pursuant to subdivisions (f), (g), (h), (i), and (l) of Section 5096.310 shall be encumbered by the recipient within three years from the date that the appropriation became effective. Regardless of the date of encumbrance of the granted funds, the recipient is expected to complete all funded projects within eight years of the effective date of the appropriation.

(2) Commencing with the Budget Bill for the 2009–10 fiscal year, any grant funds appropriated pursuant to subdivisions (f), (g), (h), (i), and (l) of Section 5096.310 that have not been expended by the grantee shall revert to the fund and be available for appropriation by the Legislature for one or more of the categories specified in Section 5096.310 that the Legislature determines to be of the highest priority
 statewide.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.342.

(a) Grant funds appropriated pursuant to subdivisions (f), (g), (h), (i), and (l) of Section 5096.310 may be expended by the grantee only for projects on lands owned by, or subject to a lease or other interest held by, the grantee.

(b) If a grant applicant does not have fee title to the lands, the applicant shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that the proposed project will provide
 public benefits that are commensurate with the type and duration of the interest in land that is held by the applicant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.343.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), no grant funds authorized pursuant to subdivisions (f), (g), (h), (i), and (l) of Section 5096.310 may be disbursed unless the applicant has agreed, in writing, to both of the following:

(1) To maintain and operate the property funded pursuant to this chapter for a period that is commensurate with the type of project and the proportion of state funds and local
 matching funds or property allocated to the capital costs of the project. With the approval of the department, the grantee, or the grantee’s successor in interest in the property, may transfer the responsibility to maintain and operate the property in accordance with this section.

(2) To use the property only for the purposes for which the grant was made and to make no other use or sale or other disposition of the property, except as authorized by specific act of the Legislature.

(b) The agreements specified in subdivision (a) shall not prevent the transfer of the property from the applicant to a public agency, if the successor public agency assumes the obligations imposed by those agreements.

(c) If the use of the property is changed to a use that is not permitted by the category from which the grant funds were
 appropriated, or if the property is sold or otherwise disposed of, an amount equal to (1) the amount of the grant, (2) the fair market value of the real property, or (3) the proceeds from the sale or other disposition, whichever is greater, shall be used by the grantee for a purpose authorized by that category, pursuant to agreement with the department as specified in subdivision (a), or shall be reimbursed to the fund and be available for appropriation by the Legislature only for a purpose authorized by that category. If the property sold or otherwise disposed of is less than the entire interest in the property funded with the grant, an amount equal to either the proceeds from the sale or other disposition of the interest or the fair market value of the interest sold or otherwise disposed of, whichever is greater, shall be used by the grantee for a purpose authorized by the category from which the funds were appropriated, pursuant to agreement with the department as specified in subdivision (a), or shall be
 reimbursed to the fund and be available for appropriation by the Legislature only for a use authorized by that category.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.344.

All grants, gifts, devises, or bequests to the state, that are conditioned upon being used for park, conservation, recreational, agricultural, or other such purposes, may be accepted and received on behalf of the state by the appropriate departmental director, with the approval of the Director of Finance, and those grants, gifts, devises, or bequests may be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for expenditure
 for the purposes specified in Section 5096.310.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 5.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 17, this section was submitted in Prop. 12 in place of the section proposed by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.345.

Except for funds continuously appropriated by this chapter, all appropriations of funds pursuant to Section 5096.310 for purposes of the program shall be included in the Budget Bill for the 2001–02 fiscal year, and each succeeding fiscal year, for consideration by the Legislature, and shall bear the label “Safe Neighborhood Parks, Clean Water, Clean Air, and Coastal Protection (Villaraigosa-Keeley Act) Fund.” The Budget
 Bill section shall contain separate items for each project, each class of project, or each element of the program for which an appropriation is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 6.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 17, this section was submitted in Prop. 12 in place of the section proposed by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Clean Air Improvement Program [5096.346. - 5096.346.]

5096.346.

(a) In allocating funds pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 5096.310, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection shall give preference to the planting of trees that provide greater air quality benefits and to urban forestry projects that provide greater energy conservation benefits.

(b) The Department of Forestry and Fire Protection shall consult with the State Air Resources Board in developing guidelines
 for the allocation of grant funds pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 5096.310 that promote air quality benefits.

(c) State and local agencies shall consider potential air quality benefits when allocating funds received pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.6. Sierra Nevada-Cascade Mountain Region [5096.347. - 5096.347.]

5096.347.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the Sierra Nevada and Cascade Mountain Region constitutes a unique and important environmental, anthropological, cultural, scientific, educational, recreational, scenic, water, watershed, and wildlife resource that should be held in trust for the enjoyment of, and appreciated by, present and future generations.

(b) The secretary shall administer grants to the Sierra Nevada-Cascade Program to assist local governments, agencies, districts, and nonprofit organizations working in collaboration with those local governments, agencies, and districts to plan, create, and conserve the Sierra-Cascade natural ecosystem. The secretary shall make funds available on a competitive basis for all of the following activities:

(1) The acquisition and restoration of riparian habitat in accordance with Sections 7048 and 78682.2 of the Water Code to improve water quality, and to protect, restore, or rehabilitate watersheds, streams wetlands, or other aquatic habitat.

(2) Capital improvement projects that provide park and recreational opportunities.

(3) Access to trails and public
 lands, in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 5070) of Chapter 1 of Division 5.

(4) Acquisition of park lands or recreational facilities.

(c) The secretary shall give priority to fund up to two million dollars ($2,000,000) for Commons Beach improvements on properties owned or administered by local agencies in the Lake Tahoe area, that will provide improved lake access, bicycle and pedestrian trail linkages, and interpretative facilities.

(d) The secretary may provide the following capital outlay grants:

(1) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for capital outlay to an incorporated city all or part of the territory of which is located within five miles of the boundary line between San Joaquin County and Sacramento County.

(2) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) to the department for the renovation of a state historical point of interest near the intersection of Jack Tone Road and State Highway 88.

(e) For the purposes of this article, the Sierra Nevada-Cascade Mountain Region includes those portions of Fresno County, Kern County, Stanislaus County, and Tulare County, and counties with populations of less than 250,000 as of the 1990 United States Census, that are located in the mountains, the foothills, and the area adjacent to the geologic formations of the Sierra Nevada and Cascade mountain ranges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 7.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 17, this section was submitted in Prop. 12 in place of the section proposed by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.7. Murray-Hayden Urban Parks and Youth Service Program [5096.348. - 5096.348.]

5096.348.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, funds allocated pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 5096.310 shall be allocated, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for parks, park facilities, or environmental youth service centers that are within the immediate proximity of a neighborhood that has been identified by the department as having a critical lack of park or open-space lands or
 deteriorated park facilities, that are in an area of significant poverty and unemployment, and that have a shortage of services for youth. Priority shall be given to capital projects that employ neighborhood residents and at-risk youth.

(b) (1) Fifty percent of the funds allocated pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 5096.310 shall be made available on a competitive basis to heavily urbanized counties and cities or to nonprofit organizations or park districts in those counties and cities, in compliance with subdivision (a) and the matching requirements of the Roberti-Z’berg-Harris Urban Open-Space and Recreation Program Act (Chapter 3.2 (commencing with Section 5620).

(2) No more than 10 percent of the amounts made available pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be allocated to fund grants pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 990) of Part 1 of
 Division 2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, at least 50 percent of which shall be granted to youth service organizations eligible for tax-exempt status pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that are chartered by a national youth service organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 8.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 17, this section was submitted in Prop. 12 in place of the section proposed by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Wildlife Program [5096.350. - 5096.350.]

5096.350.

(a) Funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (m) of Section 5096.310 shall be available for expenditure by the Wildlife Conservation Board for the acquisition, development, rehabilitation, restoration, and protection of real property benefiting fish and wildlife, for the acquisition, restoration, or protection of habitat that promotes recovery of threatened, endangered, or fully protected species,
 maintains the genetic integrity of wildlife populations, and serves as corridors linking otherwise separate habitat to prevent habitat fragmentation, and for grants and related state administrative costs pursuant to the Wildlife Conservation Law of 1947 (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code), for the following purposes:

(1) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for the acquisition or restoration of wetland habitat, as follows:

(A) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for the acquisition, preservation, restoration, and establishment, or any combination thereof, of habitat for waterfowl or other wetlands-associated wildlife, as provided for in the Central Valley Habitat Joint Venture Component of the North American Waterfowl Management Plan and the Inland Wetlands Conservation Program, notwithstanding Section 711 of the Fish and Game Code.
 Preference shall be given to projects involving the acquisition of perpetual conservation easements; habitat development projects on lands which will be managed primarily as waterfowl habitat in perpetuity; waterfowl habitat development projects on agricultural lands; the reduction of fishery impacts resulting from supply diversions that have a direct benefit to wetlands and waterfowl habitat; or programs to establish permanent buffer areas, including, but not limited to, agricultural lands that are necessary to preserve the acreage and habitat values of existing wetlands.

(B) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for the acquisition, development, restoration, and protection of wetlands and adjacent lands, or any combination thereof, located outside the Sacramento-San Joaquin Valley.

(2) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for the development, acquisition from a willing seller, or
 restoration of riparian habitat and watershed conservation programs.

(3) Forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000), upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the restoration, or acquisition from a willing seller, of habitat for threatened and endangered species or for the purpose of promoting the recovery of those species. Five million dollars ($5,000,000) of that amount shall be for the acquisition of property along the central coast containing coastal terrace prairie, federally listed spineflower, state listed San Francisco popcorn flower, and candidates for federal listing including ohlone tiger beetle and opler’s longhorned moth. No funds may be expended pursuant to this paragraph for the acquisition of real property or other actions taken pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of the Fish and Game Code.

(4) Thirteen million dollars ($13,000,000) for the
 acquisition from a willing seller, or restoration of forest lands, including, but not limited to, ancient redwoods and oak woodlands. Not more than five million dollars ($5,000,000) of this amount shall be expended on the federal Legacy Forest Program (16 U.S.C. Sec. 2103) to meet federal matching requirements and not less than five million dollars ($5,000,000) of this amount shall be allocated for the preservation of oak woodlands. Not more than five million dollars ($5,000,000) of this amount shall be expended on the federal Legacy Forest Program (16 U.S.C. Sec. 2103) to meet federal matching requirements and not less than five million dollars ($5,000,000) of this amount shall be allocated for the preservation of oak woodlands.

(5) Eighty-two million five hundred thousand dollars ($82,500,000), upon appropriation by the Legislature, to match funds contributed by federal or local agencies or nonprofit organizations for the acquisition,
 restoration, or protection of habitat or habitat corridors that promote the recovery of threatened, endangered, or fully protected species. Projects funded pursuant to this paragraph may include restoration projects authorized pursuant to Public Law 105-372, the Salton Sea Reclamation Act of 1998. The board shall require matching contributions of funds, real property, or other resources from other public agencies, private parties, or nonprofit organizations, at a level designed to obtain the maximum conservation benefits to wildlife and wildlife habitat. No funds may be expended pursuant to this paragraph for the acquisition of real property or other actions taken pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of the Fish and Game Code.

(6) One hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purpose of funding the acquisition of real property subject to a natural community conservation plan adopted
 pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of the Fish and Game Code, if the acquisition of the real property is conducted in conjunction with a natural community conservation plan approved by the Department of Fish and Game prior to January 1, 1999, or if the acquisition is approved by statute.

(7) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for environmental restoration projects for the following purposes approved pursuant to the Salton Sea Restoration Project authorized by Public Law 105-372, the Salton Sea Reclamation Act of 1998, and identified in the Final Environmental Impact Statement of the Salton Sea Restoration Project:

(A) Reduce and stabilize the overall salinity of the Salton Sea.

(B) Stabilize the surface elevation of the Salton Sea.

(C) Reclaim, in the long term, healthy fish and wildlife resources and their habitats.

(D) Enhance the potential for recreational uses of the Salton Sea.

(b) Not more than 5 percent of the funds authorized for expenditure by this section may be used for public access and wildlife-oriented public use projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 9.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 17, this section was submitted in Prop. 12 in place of the section proposed by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Lake Tahoe Program [5096.351. - 5096.351.]

5096.351.

(a) The Legislature has recognized the need to protect and restore the fragile environment at Lake Tahoe; and the Tahoe Regional Planning Agency has prepared an Environmental Improvement Program that outlines a capital outlay approach to help achieve environmental thresholds in the Lake Tahoe Basin, which allocates funding responsibilities over the first 10 years of the program in the amounts of approximately two hundred seventy-four million dollars ($274,000,000) to the
 State of California, two hundred ninety-seven million dollars ($297,000,000) to the federal government, eighty-two million dollars ($82,000,000) to the State of Nevada, one hundred one million dollars ($101,000,000) to local governments, and one hundred fifty-three million dollars ($153,000,000) to the private sector.

(b) Funds allocated pursuant to subdivision (n) of Section 5096.310 shall be available for expenditure for the development, restoration, acquisition from a willing seller, and enhancement of real property, by the California Tahoe Conservancy within the Lake Tahoe region pursuant to Title 7.42 (commencing with Section 66905) of the Government Code for the following purposes:

(1) Protecting the natural environment through preservation of environmentally sensitive lands, soil erosion control, restoration or enhancement of watershed lands, and restoration or enhancement
 of streams and other natural areas.

(2) Providing public access and public recreation opportunities.

(3) Enhancing and restoring wildlife areas.

(c) The provision of these funds is to meet applicable state responsibilities pursuant to the Tahoe Regional Planning Agency’s Environmental Improvement Program.

(d) The allocation of these funds has been made in the expectation that the federal government, the State of Nevada, local jurisdictions, and the private sector will fulfill their respective obligations pursuant to the Environmental Improvement Program. The secretary shall report annually to the Legislature on the progress of the development and implementation of the Environmental Improvement Program, and the provision of these funds may be restricted
 in the event that the parties are found to be making inadequate progress or are not making good faith efforts towards fulfilling their respective obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Coastal Protection Program [5096.352. - 5096.352.]

5096.352.

Funds allocated pursuant to subdivision (o) of Section 5096.310 shall be available for expenditure by the State Coastal Conservancy pursuant to Division 21 (commencing with Section 31000) for the acquisition from a willing seller, preservation, restoration, and enhancement of real property or an interest in real property in coastal areas and watersheds within its jurisdiction and the development of public use facilities
 in those areas in accordance with the following schedule:

(a) Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) for projects funded pursuant to the San Francisco Bay Area Conservancy Program established pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 31160) of Division 21.

(b) (1) Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be made available to the Santa Monica Bay Restoration Project to fund grants to public entities and nonprofit organizations to implement storm water and urban runoff pollution prevention programs, habitat restoration, and other priority actions specified in the Santa Monica Restoration Plan. The Santa Monica Bay Watershed Council shall determine project eligibility and establish grant priority.

(2) The Santa Monica Bay Watershed Council or the State Coastal Conservancy may
 require the grant recipient to provide a portion of matching funds for any funding received. The council or the state conservancy may use the funds as matching funds for federal or other grant funding.

(c) Sixty-four million two hundred thousand dollars ($64,200,000) of the funds available may be expended by the State Coastal Conservancy directly or as grants to government entities and nonprofit organizations for the purposes of Division 21 (commencing with Section 31000), and for the following and related purposes, including, but not limited to, the acquisition, enhancement, restoration, protection, and development of coastal resources, beaches, waterfronts, and public accessways in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) An amount not to exceed three million dollars ($3,000,000) may be expended on regional approaches to reduce beach erosion. Up to thirteen million dollars
 ($13,000,000) shall be made available for the restoration and protection of the Upper Newport Bay Ecological Reserve.

(2) At least fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) shall be expended in coastal areas north of the Gualala River.

(3) At least twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be expended within Santa Cruz, Monterey, San Luis Obispo, or Santa Barbara Counties. One million dollars ($1,000,000) shall be allocated to the City of Monterey to fund public access and open space along the waterfront for the Window on the Bay.

(4) At least five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be expended on completion of the Coastal Trail.

(5) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) shall be dedicated to projects for the Guadalupe River Trail and the San Francisco Bay
 Ridge Trail.

(d) Twenty-two million dollars ($22,000,000) may be expended by the State Coastal Conservancy directly or as grants to government entities and nonprofit organizations consistent with Division 21 (commencing with Section 31000), and for administrative costs in connection therewith, for the acquisition, development, rehabilitation, restoration, enhancement, and protection of real property, or other actions that benefit fish and wildlife. At least ten million dollars ($10,000,000) of those funds shall be expended in coastal areas north of the Gualala River. Eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000) shall be spent to restore the arroyo chub, partially armored stickleback, and southern steelhead fisheries to their native creeks of San Mateo Creek, and its tributary Devil Canyon Creek, and San Onofre Creek located in San Diego County.

(e) Twenty-five million dollars
 ($25,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the State Coastal Conservancy and the Department of Fish and Game for direct expenditure and for grants to public agencies and nonprofit organizations to protect, restore, acquire, and enhance habitat for salmon. These funds may be used to match federal funding available for those purposes.

(f) Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) of the funds shall be allocated to acquire, protect, and restore wetlands projects that are a minimum of 400 acres in size in any county with a population greater than 5,000,000.

(g) Twelve million five hundred thousand dollars ($12,500,000) shall be allocated to acquire land needed to connect important coastal watershed and scenic areas in the Laguna Coast Wilderness Park.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 10.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 17, this section was submitted in Prop. 12 in place of the section proposed by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Mountain Resource Program [5096.353. - 5096.354.]

5096.353.

Funds allocated pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 5096.310 shall be available to the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy for capital outlay and grants for the acquisition from a willing seller, enhancement, and restoration of natural lands, improvement of public recreation facilities, and for grants to local agencies and nonprofit organizations to increase access to parks and recreational opportunities for underserved
 urban communities, in accordance with the following schedule:

Thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) to acquire, improve, or restore park, wildlife, or natural areas, including areas near or adjacent to units of the state park system wherever such units may be situated within a local jurisdiction within the Santa Monica Mountains Zone or Rim of the Valley Trail Corridor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 11.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 17, this section was submitted in Prop. 12 in place of the section proposed by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.354.

Funds allocated pursuant to subdivision (q) of Section 5096.310 shall be available to the Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy for expenditure for the acquisition, development, enhancement, and protection of land, and for administrative costs incurred in connection therewith, in accordance with Division 23.5 (commencing with Section 33500).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. San Joaquin River Program [5096.355. - 5096.355.]

5096.355.

Funds allocated pursuant to subdivision (r) of Section 5096.310 shall be available to the San Joaquin River Conservancy for expenditure of the acquisition, development, enhancement, and protection of land, and for administrative costs incurred in connection therewith, in accordance with Division 22.5 (commencing with Section 32500).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Agriculture Program [5096.356. - 5096.356.]

5096.356.

(a) Funds allocated pursuant to subdivision (t) of Section 5096.310 shall be available to the Department of Conservation for grants, on a competitive basis, to state and local agencies and nonprofit organizations for farmland protection and administration of the Agricultural Land Stewardship Program Act of 1995 (Division 10.2 (commencing with Section 10200)), or its successor program. This purpose
 shall include, but not be limited to, the placement of improvements and acquisition of agricultural conservation easements and other interests in land pursuant to the Agricultural Land Stewardship Program.

(b) At least 20 percent of the funds allocated pursuant to subdivision (t) of Section 5096.310 shall be available for projects that preserve agricultural lands and protect water quality in the counties that serve the San Pablo Bay.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 12.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 17, this section was submitted in Prop. 12 in place of the section proposed by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Fish and Game Program [5096.357. - 5096.357.]

5096.357.

(a) Funds allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (v) of Section 5096.310 shall be available to the Department of Fish and Game for the development, enhancement, restoration, and preservation of land pursuant to Sections 1580 and 10503 of, and subdivision (b) of Section 1525 of, the Fish and Game Code. The provision of these funds shall be in accordance with an expenditure plan developed
 by the Department of Fish and Game and approved by the Department of Finance.

(b) Funds allocated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (v) of Section 5096.310 shall be made available to the Department of Fish and Game for the exclusive purpose of acquiring habitat preservation and enhancement agreements on private wetlands pursuant to the California Waterfowl Habitat Program—Phase II and administrative costs incurred in connection therewith. Expenditure of those funds shall be consistent with the purposes identified in Section 3702 of the Fish and Game Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 13.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 17, this section was submitted in Prop. 12 in place of the section proposed by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. California Indian Tribe Participation [5096.358. - 5096.358.]

5096.358.

To the extent funds authorized pursuant to this chapter are available for competitive grants to local government entities, federally recognized California Indian tribes may apply for those grants, the tribe’s application shall be considered on its merits, and the tribes shall expend any funds received for the purpose authorized by this chapter for which the funds are made available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Fiscal Provisions [5096.360. - 5096.372.]

5096.360.
